Utah statutes.
31A-5-216.   Change of domicile.
(1)  A foreign insurance corporation may become a Utah insurance corporation
if it submits an application which evidences that the corporation complies
with all of the requirements imposed on domestic Utah corporations.  The
commissioner may, by order after a hearing, relax the requirements of this
chapter applicable to corporations in the process of organization that,
because of the developed status of the insurer, he finds unnecessary to
protect policyholders and the public.  The commissioner shall simultaneously
issue a certificate of organization under Subsection 31A-5-204(3) and a
certificate of authority under Subsection 31A-5-212(2) when the conditions for
both have been satisfied.
(2)  Upon approval by the commissioner, a domestic insurer may transfer its
domicile to any other state in which it is admitted.  The commissioner shall
approve the transfer of domicile unless he finds that the transfer will
prejudice the interests of policyholders, creditors, or the public in Utah.
The commissioner may require a special deposit, reinsurance, or other
protective measures as an alternative to rejecting the insurer's application
to move.  After or simultaneous with the removal of the corporation, it may
seek entry into this state as a foreign corporation under Chapter 14.
(3)  The transfer of domicile of an insurance corporation under either
Subsection (1) or Subsection (2) does not affect the obligations of the
corporation under its existing insurance contracts or any other existing
contracts.
